California statutes. Corporations Code
(c) If a dissolved limited partnership does not have a general partner, a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities may be appointed by the consent of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subdivision:

(1) has the powers of a general partner under Section 15908.04; and

(2) shall promptly amend the certificate of limited partnership to state:

(A) that the limited partnership does not have a general partner;

(B) the name of the person that has been appointed to wind up the limited partnership; and

(C) the address of the person.

(d) On the application of any partner, the appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up, including the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities, if:

(1) a limited partnership does not have a general partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to subdivision (c); or

(2) the applicant establishes other good cause.

(e) Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the limited partners winding up the affairs of the partnership pursuant to this section shall be entitled to reasonable compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.04.

(a) A limited partnership is bound by a general partner’s act after dissolution which:

(1) is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership’s activities; or

(2) would have bound the limited partnership under Section 15904.02 before dissolution, if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

(b) A person dissociated as a general partner binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

(1) at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(A) less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(B) the other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner; and

(2) the act:

(A) is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership’s activities; or

(B) would have bound the limited partnership under Section 15904.02 before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.05.

(a) If a general partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under subdivision (a) of Section 15908.04 by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership’s activities, the general partner is liable:

(1) to the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

(2) if another general partner or a person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to that other general partner or person for any damage caused to that other general partner or person arising from the liability.

(b) If a person dissociated as a general partner causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under subdivision (b) of Section 15908.04, the person is liable:

(1) to the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

(2) if a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.06.

(a) A dissolved limited partnership may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in subdivision (b).

(b) A dissolved limited partnership may notify its known claimants of the dissolution in a record. The notice must:

(1) specify the information required to be included in a claim;

(2) provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

(3) state the deadline for receipt of the claim, which may not be less than 120 days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

(4) state that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c) A claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred if the requirements of subdivision (b) are met and:

(1) the claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

(2) in the case of a claim that is timely received but rejected in writing by the dissolved limited partnership, the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the claim against the limited partnership within 90 days after the receipt of a written notice of the rejection.

(d) This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or a liability that is contingent on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.07.

(a) A dissolved limited partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the limited partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

(b) The notice must:

(1) be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the dissolved limited partnership’s principal office is located or, if it has none in this state, in the county in which the limited partnership’s principal office is or was last located;

(2) describe the information required to be
 contained in a claim and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent; and

(3) state that a claim against the limited partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced within four years after publication of the notice.

(c) If a dissolved limited partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subdivision (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited partnership within four years after the publication date of the notice:

(1) a claimant that did not receive notice in a record under Section 15908.06;

(2) a claimant whose
 claim was timely sent to the dissolved limited partnership but not acted on; and

(3) a claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(d) A claim not barred under this section may be enforced:

(1) against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets;

(2) if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or the limited partnership’s assets distributed to the partner or transferee in liquidation, whichever is less, but a person’s total liability for all claims under this paragraph
 does not
 exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person as part of the winding up of the dissolved limited partnership; or

(3) against any person liable on the claim under Section 15904.04.

(e) Publication of a notice of dissolution of a limited partnership pursuant to this section shall not bar the collection of any tax, interest, penalty or addition to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, Part 10.20 (commencing with Section 18401) of, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 94.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.08.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 15908.06 or 15908.07, any corresponding claim under Section 15904.04 is also barred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.09.

(a) In winding up a limited partnership’s activities, the assets of the limited partnership, including the contributions required by this section, must be applied to satisfy the limited partnership’s obligations to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners that are creditors.

(b) Any surplus remaining after the limited partnership complies with subdivision (a) must be returned to the partners as they share in distributions.

(c) If a limited partnership’s assets are insufficient to satisfy all of its obligations under subdivision (a) the following rules apply:

(1) Each person that was a general partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under Section 15906.07 shall contribute to the limited partnership for the purpose of enabling the limited partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

(2) If a person does not contribute the full amount required under paragraph (1) with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the limited partnership, the other persons required to contribute by paragraph (1) on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred.

(3) If a person does not make the additional contribution required by paragraph (2), further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in that paragraph.

(d) A person that makes an additional contribution under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c) necessitated the additional contribution. A person may not recover under this subdivision more than the amount additionally contributed. A person’s liability under this subdivision may not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

(e) The estate of a deceased individual is liable for the person’s obligations under this section.

(f) An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, may enforce a person’s obligation to contribute under subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Foreign Limited Partnership [15909.01. - 15909.08.]

15909.01.

(a) The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern relations among the partners of the foreign limited partnership and between the partners and the foreign limited partnership and the liability of partners as partners for an obligation of the foreign limited partnership, except as to foreign limited liability limited partnerships, which shall be treated as if they were foreign limited partnerships.

(b) A foreign limited partnership may not be denied a certificate of registration by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited partnership is organized and the laws of this state.

(c) A certificate of registration does not authorize a foreign limited partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a limited partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.02.

(a) A foreign limited partnership may apply for a certificate of registration to transact business in this state by delivering an application signed and acknowledged by a general partner of the foreign limited partnership to, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall state all of the following:

(1) The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if the name does not comply with Section 15901.08, an alternate name adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15909.05.

(2) The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited partnership is organized and
 a statement that the foreign limited partnership is authorized to exercise its powers and privileges in that state or jurisdiction.

(3) The street address of the foreign limited partnership’s principal office and, if the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited partnership is organized require the foreign limited partnership to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the address of the required office.

(4) The mailing address of the foreign limited partnership’s
 principal office, if different from the street address.

(5) The name and street address of the foreign limited partnership’s initial agent for service of process in this state in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15901.16.

(6) The name and address of each of the foreign limited partnership’s general partners.

(7) Whether the foreign limited partnership is a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

(b) A foreign limited partnership shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence or a record of similar import issued within the past six months from the submission of the application for
 filing in California signed by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of the foreign limited partnership’s publicly filed records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited partnership is organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 95.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.03.

(a) Activities of a foreign limited partnership that do not constitute transacting business in this state for registration purposes within the meaning of this article include the activities set forth in subdivision (ai) of Section 15901.02.

(b) For purposes of this article, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subdivision (a), constitutes transacting business in this state.

(c) This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited partnership to service of process, taxation jurisdiction, or regulation under any other law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.04.

Unless the Secretary of State determines that an application for a certificate of registration does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the Secretary of State, upon payment of all requisite fees, shall file the application and shall issue to the foreign limited partnership a certificate of registration stating the date of filing of the application and that the foreign limited partnership is qualified to transact intrastate business, subject, however, to any licensing requirements otherwise imposed by the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.05.

(a) A foreign limited partnership whose name does not comply with Section 15901.08 may not obtain a certificate of registration until it adopts, for the purpose of transacting business in this state, an alternate name that complies with Section 15901.08.

(b) If a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state changes its name to one that does not comply with Section 15901.08, it may not thereafter transact business in this state until it complies with subdivision (a) and obtains an amended certificate of registration.

(c) The Secretary of State may cancel the
 application and certificate of registration of a foreign limited partnership if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give a first written notice of the applicability of this section to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent, the Secretary of State shall give a second written notice of cancellation and the cancellation shall thereupon be effective. The second notice shall be given 20 days or more after the first notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 96.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.06.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any statements made have become erroneous, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly deliver to, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State an amendment to the application for registration containing the name of the foreign limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number of the foreign limited partnership signed and acknowledged by the general partner amending the statement. If a foreign limited partnership delivers an amendment changing the name of the foreign limited partnership in its jurisdiction of organization, annexed to the amendment to the application for registration shall be a certificate issued within the
 past six months from the submission of the amendment for filing in California from an authorized public official of the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of organization to the effect that the foreign limited partnership is in good standing and that the change of name was made in accordance with the laws of that jurisdiction, if the laws of that jurisdiction permit the issuance of those certificates, or, in the alternative, a statement by the foreign limited partnership issued within the past six months from the submission of the amendment for filing in California that the laws of its jurisdiction of organization do not permit the issuance of those certificates. Unless the Secretary of State determines that the amendment to the application changing the name or alternate name of a foreign limited partnership does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the Secretary of State, upon payment
 of all requisite fees, shall file the amended application and shall issue to the foreign limited partnership a new certificate of registration stating the date of filing of the amendment to the application changing the name and that the foreign limited partnership is qualified to transact intrastate business, subject to any licensing requirements otherwise imposed by the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 97.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.07.

(a) In order to cancel its certificate of registration to transact business in this state, a foreign limited partnership must deliver to and on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of cancellation containing the name of the foreign limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number of the foreign limited partnership signed and acknowledged by a general partner of the foreign limited partnership. The registration is canceled when the certificate becomes effective under Section 15902.06.

(b) A foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of
 registration to transact business in this state.

(c) Any foreign limited partnership that transacts intrastate business in this state without registration is subject to a penalty of twenty dollars ($20) for each day that the unauthorized intrastate business is transacted, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). An action to recover this penalty may be brought, and any recovery shall be paid, as provided in Section 2258.

(d) The failure of a foreign limited partnership to have a certificate of registration to transact business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(e) A partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable for the obligations of the
 foreign limited partnership solely by reason of the foreign limited partnership’s having transacted business in this state without a certificate of registration.

(f) If a foreign limited partnership transacts business in this state without a certificate of registration or cancels its certificate of registration, it appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for rights of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 29.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.08.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Actions by Partners [15910.01. - 15910.06.]

15910.01.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a partner may maintain a direct action against the limited partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to the partnership’s activities, to enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(b) A partner bringing a direct action under this section is required to plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited partnership.

(c) The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15910.02.

A partner may bring a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

(1) the partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(2) a demand would be futile.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15910.03.

(a) A derivative action may be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the time the action is commenced and:

(1) that was a partner when the conduct giving rise to action occurred; or

(2) whose status as a partner devolved upon the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of that conduct.

(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, any partner who does not meet the foregoing requirements may nevertheless be allowed in the discretion of the court to maintain the action on a preliminary showing to and determination by the court, by motion and after a hearing, at which the court shall consider such evidence, by affidavit or testimony, as it deems material that (1) there is a strong prima facie case in favor of the claim asserted on behalf of the partnership, (2) no other similar action has been or is likely to be instituted, (3) the plaintiff acquired the shares before there was disclosure to the public and to the plaintiff of the wrongdoing of which plaintiff complains, (4) unless the action can be maintained the defendant may retain a gain derived from the defendant’s willful breach of a fiduciary duty, and (5) the requested relief will not result in unjust enrichment of the partnership or any partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15910.04.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

(1) the date and content of plaintiff’s demand and the general partners’ response to the demand; or

(2) why demand is excused as futile.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15910.05.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b):

(1) any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited partnership and not to the derivative plaintiff;

(2) if the derivative plaintiff receives any of those proceeds, the derivative plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the limited partnership.

(b) If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15910.06.

(a) In any derivative action, at any time within 30 days after service of summons upon the limited partnership or the general partner, the limited partnership or general partner may move the court for an order, upon notice and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to furnish a bond as hereinafter provided. The motion shall be based upon one or both of the following grounds:

(1) That there is no reasonable possibility that the prosecution of the cause of action alleged in the complaint against the moving party will benefit the limited partnership or its partners.

(2) That the moving party, if other than the partnership, did not participate in the transaction complained of in any capacity. The court on application of the limited partnership or the general partner may, for good cause shown, extend the 30-day period for an additional period or periods not exceeding 60 days.

(b) At the hearing upon any motion pursuant to subdivision (a) the court shall consider such evidence, written or oral, by witnesses or affidavit, as may be material (1) to the ground or grounds upon which the motion is based, or (2) to a determination of the probable reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, of the limited partnership and the general partner which will be incurred in defense of the action. If the court determines, after hearing the evidence adduced by the parties, that the moving party has established a probability in support of any of the grounds upon which the motion is based, the court shall fix the amount of the bond, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be furnished by the plaintiff for reasonable expenses, including attorneys fees, which may be incurred by the moving party and the limited partnership in connection with the action, including expenses for which the limited partnership may become liable pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 15904.06. A ruling by the court on the motion shall not be a determination of any issue in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon motion, makes a determination that a bond shall be furnished by the plaintiff as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to the defendant or defendants, unless the bond required by the court has been furnished within such reasonable time as may be fixed by the court.

(c) If the plaintiff shall, either before or after a motion is made pursuant to subdivision (a), or any order or determination pursuant to the motion, furnish a bond in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to secure the reasonable expenses of the parties entitled to make the motion, the plaintiff has complied with the requirements of this section and with any order for a bond theretofore made, any such motion then pending shall be dismissed and no further additional bond shall be required.

(d) If a motion is filed pursuant to subdivision (a), no pleadings need to be filed by the limited partnership or any other defendant and the prosecution of the action shall be stayed until 10 days after the motion has been disposed of.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Conversion and Merger [15911.01. - 15911.19.]

15911.01.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Converted entity” means the other business entity or foreign other business entity or foreign limited partnership that results from a conversion of a domestic limited partnership under this chapter.

(b) “Converted limited partnership” means a domestic limited partnership that results from a conversion of an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership pursuant to Section 15911.08.

(c) “Converting limited partnership” means a domestic limited partnership that converts to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Converting entity” means an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership that converts to a domestic limited partnership pursuant to the terms of Section 15911.08.

(e) “Constituent corporation” means a corporation that is merged with or into one or more limited partnerships or other business entities, and that includes a surviving corporation.

(f) “Constituent limited partnership” means a limited partnership that is merged with or into one or more other limited partnerships or other business entities, and that includes a surviving limited partnership.

(g) “Constituent other business entity” means an other business entity that is merged with or into one or more limited partnerships, and that includes a surviving other business entity.

(h) “Disappearing limited partnership” means a constituent limited partnership that is not the surviving limited partnership.

(i) “Disappearing other business entity” means a constituent other business entity that is not the surviving other business entity.

(j) “Foreign other business entity” means an other business entity formed under the laws of any state other than this state or under the laws of a foreign country.

(k) “Other business entity” means a corporation, general partnership, limited liability company, business trust, real estate investment trust, or unincorporated association, other than a nonprofit association, but excludes a limited partnership.

(l) “Surviving limited partnership” means a limited partnership into which one or more other limited partnerships or other business entities are merged.

(m) “Surviving other business entity” means another business entity into which one or more limited partnerships are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.02.

(a) A limited partnership may be converted into another business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership pursuant to this article if both of the following apply:

(1) Pursuant to a conversion into a domestic or foreign partnership or limited liability company or into a foreign limited partnership, each of the partners of the converting limited partnership receives a percentage interest in the profits and capital of the converted entity equal to that partner’s percentage interest in profits and capital of the converting limited partnership as of the effective time of the conversion.

(2) Pursuant to a conversion into an other business entity or foreign other business entity not specified in paragraph (1), both of the following occur:

(A) Each limited partnership interest of the same class is treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, interests, or securities of the converted entity, unless all limited partners of the class consent.

(B) The nonredeemable limited partnership interests of the converting limited partnership are converted only into nonredeemable interests or securities of the converted entity, unless all holders of the unredeemable interests consent.

(b) The conversion of a limited partnership to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership may be effected only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The law under which the converted entity will exist expressly permits the formation of that entity pursuant to a conversion.

(2) The limited partnership complies with all other requirements of any other law that applies to conversion to the converted entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.03.

(a) A limited partnership that desires to convert to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership shall approve a plan of conversion. The plan of conversion shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the conversion.

(2) The place of the organization of the converted entity and of the converting limited partnership and the name of the converted entity after conversion.

(3) The manner of converting the limited and general partnership interests of each of the partners into shares of, securities of,
 or interests in, the converted entity.

(4) The provisions of the governing documents for the converted entity, including the partnership agreement, limited liability company articles of organization and operating agreement, or articles or certificate of incorporation if the converted entity is a corporation, to which the holders of interests in the converted entity are to be bound.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are required by the laws under which the converted entity is organized, or that are desired by the parties.

(b) The plan of conversion shall be approved by all general partners of the converting limited partnership and by a majority in interest of each class of limited partners of the converting
 limited partnership, unless a greater or lesser approval is required by the partnership agreement of the converting limited partnership. However, if the limited partners of the limited partnership would become personally liable for any obligations of the converted entity as a result of the conversion, the plan of conversion shall be approved by all of the limited partners of the converting limited partnership, unless the plan of conversion provides that all limited partners will have dissenters’ rights as provided in Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 15911.20).

(c) Upon the effectiveness of the conversion, all partners of the converting limited partnership, except those that exercise dissenters’ rights as provided in Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 15911.20), shall be deemed parties to any governing documents for the
 converted entity adopted as part of the plan of conversion, irrespective of whether or not the partner has executed the plan of conversion or the governing documents for the converted entity. Any adoption of governing documents made pursuant thereto shall be effective at the effective time or date of the conversion.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, a plan of conversion may be amended before the conversion takes effect if the amendment is approved by all general partners of the converting limited partnership and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the plan of conversion, the amendment is approved by the limited partners of the converting limited partnership in the same manner and to the same extent as required for the approval of the original plan of conversion.

(e) The general partners of a converting limited partnership may, by unanimous approval at any time before the conversion is effective, in their discretion, abandon a conversion, without further approval by the limited partners, subject to the contractual rights of third parties other than limited partners.

(f) The converted entity shall keep the plan of conversion at the principal office of the converted entity if the converted entity is a domestic partnership or foreign other business entity, at the principal office of, or registrar or transfer agent of, the converted entity, if the converted entity is a domestic corporation, or at the office at which records are to be kept under Section 17701.13 if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company. Upon the request of a partner of a converting limited partnership, the authorized
 person on behalf of the converted entity shall promptly deliver to the partner or the holder of shares, interests, or other securities, at the expense of the converted entity, a copy of the plan of conversion. A waiver by a partner of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 98.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.04.

(a) A conversion into an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited partnership shall become effective upon the earliest date that all of the following occur:

(1) The plan of conversion is approved by the partners of the converting limited partnership, as provided in Section 15911.03.

(2) All documents required by law to create the converted entity are filed, which documents shall also contain a statement of conversion if required under Section 15911.06.

(3) The effective date, if set forth in the plan of conversion, occurs.

(b) A copy of the statement of partnership authority or articles of organization complying with Section 15911.06, if applicable, duly certified by the Secretary of State, is conclusive evidence of the conversion of the limited partnership.
